Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.360

Inapplicability to action reviewable under Administrative Procedure Act or Land Use Petition Act.

This chapter does not apply to state agency action reviewable under chapter 34.05 RCW or to land use decisions of local jurisdictions reviewable under chapter 36.70C RCW.

[ 1995 c 347 s 716; 1989 c 175 s 38.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—Part headings and table of contents not law—1995 c 347: See notes following RCW 36.70A.470.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.